North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4.1 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4.1-30 Livestock Purchased by Packing Plants

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-30-01.
Packing plant defined.

The term “packing plant” as used in this chapter means a place where livestock, exclusive of poultry, is purchased for the purpose of slaughtering, dressing, curing, or processing the same for storage and distribution at wholesale for human consumption.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-30-02.
Livestock purchased by weight to be graded — Penalty.

An officer or employee of a packing plant within this state may not purchase any livestock by weight unless such livestock has been graded and sorted in the yard and the price per pound [.45 kilogram] for each grade fixed and determined before the livestock is weighed. Any officer or employee of a packing plant who violates this section is guilty of an infraction.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-30-03.
Penalty for purchase of livestock by weight without grading.

Each purchase of livestock in violation of section 4.1-30-02 is a separate offense and constitutes an infraction upon the part of every owner of a packing plant in which such violation occurs.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.